Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 20. Internal Security and Public Safety
Executive Order No. 20-53
(No. 16-17) [Activation of Vermont National Guard to Assist with Hurricane Irma.

As of September 11, 2017, the President of the United States had signed a Major Disaster Declaration for the State of Florida and Emergency Declarations for the States of Alabama, Georgia and South Carolina, the United States Territories of Puerto Rico
and the Virgin Islands and the Seminole Tribe of Florida and the Governor of the State of North Carolina declared a State of Emergency, all as a result of extremely high winds, excessive rain and flooding from Hurricane Irma and related
storms, and the devastating impacts and widespread damage which was anticipated and which in fact occurred. The States, Territories and Tribes affected by Hurricane Irma are responding to property damage and the human toll taken by
the storm.

Accordingly, pursuant to the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont and Commander-in-Chief, Vermont National Guard, by the Constitution of the State of Vermont, Chapter II, Section 20, and by Title 20, Chapter 4 of Vermont Statutes
Annotated, and pursuant to requests from the Governors of affected States and Territories in accordance with the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, I hereby authorize and direct the Adjutant General to call into Active State
Service, for the purpose of assisting and supporting the requesting States and Territories in their efforts to respond to the conditions created or caused by Hurricane Irma and associated storms in order to alleviate hardship and suffering
of citizens and communities and in order to preserve the lives and property of the requesting States and Territories, any and all units of the National Guard of the State of Vermont as he may deem appropriate to carry out the purposes
of this Order, to serve for an indefinite period and until relieved by proper authority.

This Order shall take effect upon signing and shall amend and restate Executive Order 16-17 originally issued September 8, 2017, and ratify all deployments made since the original issuance of this Executive Order.

Dated September 13, 2017.

Executive Order No. 20-54
(No. 17-17) [Governor’s Veterans Advisory Council.

WHEREAS, since the founding of our nation, the members of our armed forces have stood courageously against the enemies of freedom and liberty; and

WHEREAS, Vermont is currently home to more than 49,000 men and women who have served their State and country in the armed services, many at great personal sacrifice; and

WHEREAS, the conflicts overseas spanning nearly two decades bring a new generation of Veterans to Vermont; and

WHEREAS, all Vermonters are grateful for the sacrifices of our Veterans who have served our country with distinction; and

WHEREAS, as a society, we place a special responsibility on ourselves to care for our Veterans, or in the words of Calvin Coolidge, “The Nation which forgets its defenders will itself be forgotten”; and

WHEREAS, the military experience of many Vermont Veterans has created special, long-term needs requiring recognition and assistance; and

WHEREAS, the aging population of our Veterans continues to create significant new demands on public services; and

WHEREAS, for their well-being, the voices of the Veteran community must be heard clearly by the State’s political leaders at the highest level in a forum conducive to a free exchange of ideas.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby reconstitute the Governor’s Veterans Advisory Council to advise on public policy relating to Vermont’s Veterans as follows:

The Council shall advise the Governor on the full spectrum of Veterans’ needs and how State government can best address the interests of Veterans.

The Council shall be comprised of not more than fifteen (15) members and not more than four (4) alternate members appointed by the Governor. The Council will reflect the diversity of service and experience of Vermont Veterans. Council members shall serve
on the Council for a term of two years. The Governor shall appoint the Chair and Vice-Chair of the Council. The Adjutant General of the Vermont National Guard or designee, the CEO of the Vermont Veterans’ Home or designee, and the
Director of the White River Junction Veteran’s Affairs (VA) Medical Center or designee shall serve as ex-officio members of the Council.

The appointees to the Council will be broadly representative of the Veteran community and may include members of Veterans Service Organizations (VSOs), Vermont National Guard, Vermont Veterans’ Home, the VA Medical Center and Veterans Benefits Office,
Vermont General Assembly, the healthcare community, and individuals not having served in the military with an interest in Veterans’ affairs. The Office of Veterans Affairs will staff the Council.

I hereby authorize per diem compensation and reasonable and necessary expense reimbursement for travel and food for members who are not fulltime State employees pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order No. 08-03 dated May 13, 2003 (codified as Executive Order 20-30). This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 3, 2017.

Executive Order No. 20-55
(No. 03-18) [Governor’s Community Violence Prevention Task Force.

WHEREAS, we need a forum for honest, respectful and fact-based discussions about how all Vermonters can play a role to reduce the risk of violence in our communities, including identifying root causes and developing avenues for open conversations about
behavior, mental health, firearm safety, the breakdown of civil discourse and personal responsibility; and

WHEREAS, there is no single solution and Vermonters themselves must be part of any effort to ensure supportive communities, healthy families and positive school climate that are based on inclusion and promoting resiliency and acknowledging these contribute
to positive social and emotional development in children; and

WHEREAS, Vermont is not immune to the risk of extreme violence in our schools and communities as evidenced by the recent events in Fair Haven, Vermont which resulted in criminal charges being brought against an 18-year-old former student in connection
with what court records show to be a detailed plan to conduct a mass shooting at his former high school in Fair Haven, Vermont; and

WHEREAS, Vermont is currently one of the healthiest and safest states in America with many of the best - and safest - schools in the country; and

WHEREAS, we are also reminded, while we can plan for the eventuality of these horrific events, this is an opportunity to focus our efforts on understanding and addressing the root causes of violent behavior.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Governor’s Community Violence Prevention Task Force as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Governor’s Community Violence Prevention Task Force shall consist of not more than 14 members to be appointed by the Governor from inside and outside of State government. The State members shall include the Governor’s Commissioner of Public Safety,
the Secretary of the Agency of Health and Human Services, the Commissioner of the Department of Mental Health, the Agency of Education School Security Liaison Officer and the Secretary of the Agency of Digital Services or designees.

The remaining appointees to the Task Force will be broadly representative of stakeholders and may include, but not be limited to, mental health care professionals, teachers, students, school officials, sportsmen and/r licensed gun dealers, veterans, security
consultants, health care providers, first responders, states attorneys and cybersecurity professionals.

The Task Force will be co-chaired by no more than three members designated by the Governor.

The Task Force may, in its discretion, establish interagency working groups to support its mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of the executive branch of State government, including, but not limited to the Department of Health, Department
of Children and Families and the Agency of Education.

The Task Force may also, in its discretion, consult with private sector professionals outside of the Task Force for information and advice on best practices.

Community Violence Prevention Task Force Charge and Process.

The mission of the Task Force will be to identify the primary root causes of behavior that leads to violence against others in schools and communities and lead the State’s response to address these issues by ensuring full interagency and intra-agency
coordination among state and local governments and schools. The Task Force will identify strategies and lessons learned, relying on credible research and successful community-based violence prevention programs.

The Community Violence Prevention Task Force will be advisory to the Governor. The Task Force shall meet at the call of the Chair(s), but not less frequently than monthly. The Task Force shall:

Assess high-quality primary research, including evidence-based Vermont data to the extent it is available regarding the underlying causes of violent behavior in communities. At the request of the House of Representatives by way of Resolution, this review
will also consider the connection between excessive video game playing and the propensity to engage in gun violence;

Identify best practices for schools and communities to prevent violent behavior including, but not limited to, identifying warning signs and how to report them, recommending ways to improve prevention and reporting of bullying and harassment and closing
the operational gaps among the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Mental Health, the Agency of Education, law enforcement and our schools;

Identify opportunities to strengthen existing support systems to ensure every school and community has a local rapid reaction/early intervention team involving educators, mental health/social service professionals and law enforcement when concerning behavioral
issues are identified;

Review opportunities for expanding school safety prevention and preparedness capacity in the Agency of Education and the Department of Public Safety and supporting the work of the Vermont School Safety Center;

Evaluate the adequacy of protections for individuals (students and adults) reporting threats, including consideration of shield laws;

Explore the feasibility of stronger open source intelligence gathering by the Vermont Intelligence Center and the cybersecurity center with Norwich University once established; and

Review existing State health, mental health, education and criminal laws, regulations, policies, and programs and propose appropriate legislative changes, including changes to eliminate redundancy and break down barriers faced by communities and schools
in coordinating action with State government.

The Task Force will report to the Governor and make recommendations December 1, 2018, June 1, 2019 and December 1, 2019.

In consultation with the Vermont School Safety Center, the Task Force will do all things necessary to carry out the purpose of this Executive Order.

Meetings of the Task Force will be public. The Task Force will hold at least one (1) meeting in each region of the State. The Task Force shall invite public comment and participation to the greatest extent practicable.

The Community Violence Prevention Task Force shall receive administrative and staff support from the Office of the Governor, and public health data support from the Vermont Departments of Health and Mental Health.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution and shall expire December 31, 2019.

Dated April 19, 2018.

Executive Order No. 20-56
(No. 01-19) [State Emergency Management Plan Promulgation.

WHEREAS, the 2019 Vermont State Emergency Management Plan (SEMP) provides the framework for the State’s emergency management enterprise across the five mission areas identified in the National Preparedness Goal: Prevention, Protection, Response, Mitigation,
and Recovery; and

WHEREAS, the SEMP provides the mechanism for the notification, coordination, and deployment of state and federal resources, if necessary, to assist local jurisdictions in responding to, mitigating against, and recovering from disasters, regardless of
cause; and

WHEREAS, the SEMP is formulated to utilize all available federal, state, private sector, and volunteer and non-governmental agency resources in responding to or supporting the response to a disaster; and

WHEREAS, the 2019 SEMP replaces the 2013 State Emergency Operations Plan and builds on lessons learned and best practices during disaster responses, exercises, and workshops; and

WHEREAS, the Plan further includes a focus on ensuring that components are streamlined and more operational and integrates the revised National Incident Management System (NIMS) doctrine released in October 2017; and

WHEREAS, State Agencies and Departments, private sector entities, and volunteer and non-governmental organizations described in the plan partner and participate in prevention, protection, response, mitigation, and/or recovery activities and as part of
the plan have an obligation to provide services and support that save lives and protect property and the environment during a disaster.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor pursuant to

20 V.S.A. § 8
, do hereby promulgate the 2019 Vermont State Emergency Management Plan.

I further order and direct all State Agency Secretaries and Department Commissioners with defined roles and responsibilities in the State Emergency Management Plan to develop and maintain procedures to ensure emergency preparedness and the capacity to
provide response, mitigation and recovery support to the people of Vermont.

Assignments within the Plan are based on functional capabilities and statutory responsibilities of each partner. To make the Plan viable, participants must be prepared to execute their assignments when called upon during an emergency and sustain that
effort during the subsequent recovery.

Each identified State Agency and Department shall fulfill or execute its respective responsibilities outlined in this Plan.

Each identified State Agency and Department shall provide a minimum of three trained and qualified representatives to act in coordination with the Vermont Emergency Management Division (VEM) and the State Emergency Operations Center (SEOC) in the delivery
of their respective services throughout all of the mission areas.

This Plan shall be in effect as of January 1, 2019 and remain in effect through December 31, 2023. Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Plan may be amended by the Director of the Vermont Emergency Management Division.

Dated: January 4, 2019

Executive Order No. 20-57
(No. 05-19) [Emergency Communications Advisory Council.

WHEREAS, in 2012, Congress enacted The Middle Class Tax Relief and Job Creation Act that created FirstNet, the authority within the National Telecommunications and Information Administration (NTIA) to oversee the building, deployment and operation of
the Nationwide Public Safety Broadband Network (NPSBN); and

WHEREAS, by Executive Order 05-13 (codified as Executive Order 20-49), effective April 30, 2013, Governor Peter Shumlin created the Vermont Public Safety Broadband Network Commission (“Commission”), to help plan, develop, and implement an interoperable
wireless network to support the communication needs of Vermont’s first responders and others; and

WHEREAS, after four years of study and consideration, in consultation with a professional technical consultant, the first responder community and the Treasurer’s Office, and after a competitive process conducted to assess the alternatives and an independent
review conducted on behalf of the Agency of Digital Services, at its November 20, 2017 meeting the Commission voted to recommend the Governor opt-in to the FirstNet solution for the State of Vermont, thus fulfilling the Commission’s
charge to advise the Governor on issues related to the development of a public safety broadband network in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, on November 29, 2017, Governor Philip B. Scott officially “opted-in” to the federal FirstNet plan, allowing FirstNet and AT to begin deployment of the NPSBN in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, the initial deployment of the NPSBN will take place over a five-year period from 2018-2022 and will require feedback and evaluation from Vermont’s public safety community; and

WHEREAS, the deployment of broadband technology interfaces with other types of emergency communication, such as Next Generation 911, Land Mobile Radio, microwave and fiber-based systems; and

WHEREAS, it is in the best interest of the Vermont public safety community to plan for the use of this evolving technology.

NOW THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby amend and reconstitute the Commission as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The Vermont Public Safety Broadband Network Commission is hereby renamed the “Emergency Communications Advisory Council.”

The Council shall include the Commissioner of the Department of Public Safety, or designee, the Director of Vermont Emergency Management and the Statewide Interoperability Coordinator from the Department of Public Safety and the Colonel of the Vermont
State Police, or designee; the Executive Director of the Enhanced 9-1-1 Board, or designee; the Commissioner of the Department of Public Service, or designee; the Secretary of the Agency of Transportation, or designee; and
the Secretary of Digital Services, or designee.

The Governor shall appoint members from the Vermont State Firefighters Association; Professional Firefighters of Vermont; Vermont Fire Coalition; municipal law enforcement; Sheriffs; Emergency Medical Service personnel; and one at-large member.

These Council members Council members shall be appointed by the Governor to three-year terms, except that the Governor shall stagger initial appointments so that the terms of no more than four members expire during a calendar year. In appointing Council
members, the Governor shall give due consideration to the different geographical regions of the State, and the need for balance between rural and urban areas. Council members shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

All Council members shall be voting members.

Charge.

The purpose of the Council shall be the following:

• Advise the Governor on issues related to the NPSBN and on emergency communications, generally, in Vermont;

• Advise on the needs of Vermont’s public safety community as it relates to FirstNet and the need for an interoperable, robust, reliable and affordable cellular broadband network, including advice on the placement of fixed network assets and deployables;

• Advise on protocols and policies related to the NPSBN and, as needed, on emergency communications generally; and

• Advise on planning activities needed to prepare Vermont’s public safety community for emergency communications technology transitions.

The Council shall report to the Governor bi-annually on the NPSBN in Vermont and nationally, and shall include information regarding the use of grant money received in Vermont for coordination efforts during the initial deployment phases of the NPSBN.

Council Process.

The Commissioner of the department of Public Safety shall appoint the Chair of the Council, which may be the Commissioner. The Council shall meet at the call of the Chair and shall keep the Governor apprised on the State’s overall interactions with FirstNet
and the deployment of the NPSBN in Vermont and emergency communications generally. The Council may select a Vice Chair. If necessary, the Council may designate an Executive Committee and other subcommittees. A majority of members
shall constitute a quorum.

The Council shall receive administrative support from the Department of Public Safety and meet on an as-needed basis.

Members who are not otherwise employed by the State, a County or a municipality may receive per diem compensation in accordance with

32 V.S.A. § 1010(e)
.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall supersede and replace Executive Order 05-13 (codified as Executive Order 20-49), dated April 30, 2019 and Executive Order No. 02-12 (codified as E.O. 20-44), dated January 17, 2012.

Dated July 9, 2019

Executive Order No. 20-58
(No. 06-19) [Governor’s Emergency Preparedness Advisory Council.

WHEREAS, Vermont must be prepared to prevent, respond to, recover from, mitigate and protect Vermonters from all natural and man-made hazards; and

WHEREAS, Vermont must be prepared to prevent, and protect Vermonters from terrorism, homegrown violent extremists and evolving threats both domestic and foreign; and

WHEREAS, the Governor is responsible for coordinating, to the fullest extent possible, the emergency management plans and program of the State; and

WHEREAS, it is imperative that there be the greatest possible coordination and communication among federal, state and local governments, the Vermont National Guard, first responders, law enforcement, emergency managers, public health officials, regional
planning commissions and private community organizations, including faith-based organizations in order to provide the Governor with advice and counsel on approaches to strengthen and improve our homeland security and emergency preparedness.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as the Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order and direct:

The ‘Governor’s Emergency Preparedness Advisory Council‘ (Council) is reconstituted as set forth below:

Composition and Appointments

The Council shall include members from the following interested parties to be appointed by the Governor: volunteer fire service; career fire service; emergency medical services; municipal police; sheriffs; state fusion center (in Vermont, known as the
Vermont Information Center); federal government; municipal government; local emergency management; private community organizations; the Vermont utility industry; hospitals; public health officials; statewide interoperability
governing body; disability inclusion working group; a state Citizen Corps representative; and faith-based organizations.

The Council shall include the following ex officio members or their designees: the Secretary of Civil and Military Affairs, the Adjutant General, the Secretary of Administration, the Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, the Secretary
of the Agency of Transportation, the Secretary of the Agency of Digital Services, the Secretary of the Agency of Education, the Secretary of the Agency of Human Services, the Commissioner of Health, the Commissioner of Public
Safety, the E-911 Director, the state Homeland Security Advisor, the Colonel of the Vermont State Police, the Director of the Division of Emergency Management, the Chief Information Security Officer and the Statewide Interoperability
Coordinator.

The Governor shall invite the Speaker of the House, the Lieutenant Governor and a member of the Senate appointed by the Committee on Committees to participate on the Council.

The Governor may consult with private sector professionals outside of the Council for information and advice. All State Agencies and Departments, as well as the Attorney General and the Executive Director of the Office of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs
shall participate upon request of the Governor or the Chair of the Council, as needs dictate.

The Governor shall appoint the Chair of the Council.

Charge

The mission of the Council shall be to assess the State’s overall homeland security and emergency preparedness programs, policies, and communications and provide for coordinated input by stakeholders in the preparation, implementation, evaluation and
revision of the current systems.

Further, the Council shall consider the interdependencies between the private sector, non-profit organizations, faith-based and community organizations, and all levels of government, including local, state and federal with the goal of maximizing these
relationships and reducing duplication of effort. The Council shall advise on the allocation of funding to support the programs while mindful of available financial resources and fiscal realities.

Council Process

The Council shall meet at the call of the Chair and shall advise the Governor, as needed, on the State’s overall threat and hazard preparedness, policies and communications.

Administrative and staff support shall be provided by the Department of Public Safety.

The Council may adopt operating guidelines which are consistent with this Executive Order.

Effective Date

This Executive Order shall be effective as of July 15, 2019 and shall expire on July 15, 2024.

This Executive Order supersedes and replaces Executive Order# 04-13 (codified as Executive Order No. 20-48).

Dated: July 17, 2019